Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-918
Bribery of a witness; penalty; witness receiving bribe; penalty.

(1) A person commits bribery of a witness if he offers, confers, or agrees to confer any benefit upon a witness or a person he believes is about to be called as a witness in any official proceeding with intent to:

(a) Influence him to testify falsely or unlawfully withhold any testimony; or

(b) Induce him to avoid legal process summoning him to testify; or

(c) Induce him to absent himself from an official proceeding to which he has been legally summoned.

(2) Bribery of a witness is a Class IV felony.

(3) A person who is a witness or has been called as a witness in any official proceeding commits a Class IV felony if he accepts or agrees to accept any benefit from any other person for the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 203.